ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/eo-spell/src/eo.aff
# Nomo:         eo.aff
# Funkcio:      Afiksaro por Eo-vortaro
# Komencita:    1997-08-30 de Sergio Pokrovskij <pok@el.nips.nsk.su>
# Versio 2.1.
# Lasta sxangxo:
#               Time-stamp: <2000-02-25 12:31:17 pok>
#
# Copyright 1997 Sergio Pokrovskij
#
#  This file is available on the terms of GNU General Public License
#  (Free Software Foundation, 675 Mass Ave, Cambridge, MA 02139, USA).


#
#	Affix table for Esperanto
#
# No particular settings for ispell are necessary --
# The default 32 MASKBITS for ispell are sufficient and
# you may use the same ispell for esperanto and english.

compoundwords on
#allaffixes on

# generic accents as used in esperanto word list
# All other types are defined relative to this one.
#
defstringtype "list" "nroff" ".list" ".ascii" ".txt"
#defstringtype "cxirkaux" "nroff" ".ascii" ".txt"

#boundarychars	[.]		# ret'adressoj ("." estas jxokero!)
boundarychars	[---]
#boundarychars	'

wordchars   '
wordchars	[a-c]	[A-C]
stringchar	cx	Cx
wordchars	[d-g]	[D-G]
stringchar	gx	Gx
wordchars	h	H
stringchar	hx	Hx
wordchars	[ij]	[IJ]
stringchar	jx	Jx
#wordchars	[k-p]	[K-P]
#wordchars	[rs]	[RS]
wordchars	[k-s]	[K-S]
stringchar	sx	Sx
wordchars	[tu]	[TU]
stringchar	ux	Ux
wordchars	[v-z]	[V-Z]

# TeX/LaTeX à la esperanto.sty

altstringtype "tex" "TeX" ".tex" ".bib"

altstringchar  ^c	cx
altstringchar  ^g	gx
altstringchar  ^h	hx
altstringchar  ^j	jx
altstringchar  ^s	sx
altstringchar  ^u	ux
altstringchar  ^C	Cx
altstringchar  ^G	Gx
altstringchar  ^H	Hx
altstringchar  ^J	Jx
altstringchar  ^S	Sx
altstringchar  ^U	Ux

# Unambiguous alternate forms for plain alphanumeric ASCII text files:

altstringtype "cxirkavx" "TeX" ".vx"

altstringchar  cx    cx
altstringchar  gx    gx
altstringchar  hx    hx
altstringchar  jx    jx
altstringchar  sx    sx
altstringchar  vx    ux
altstringchar  Cx    Cx
altstringchar  Gx    Gx
altstringchar  Hx    Hx
altstringchar  Jx    Jx
altstringchar  Sx    Sx
altstringchar  Vx    Ux

altstringtype "latin3" "nroff" ".l3" ".lt3"
#
altstringchar  æ   cx
altstringchar  ø   gx
altstringchar  ¶   hx
altstringchar  ¼   jx
altstringchar  þ   sx
altstringchar  ý   ux
altstringchar  Æ   Cx
altstringchar  Ø   Gx
altstringchar  ¦   Hx
altstringchar  ¬   Jx
altstringchar  Þ   Sx
altstringchar  Ý   Ux

altstringtype "Word" "tex" ".rtf"
#
altstringchar  \'e6  cx
altstringchar  \'f8  gx
altstringchar  \'b6  hx
altstringchar  \'bc  jx
altstringchar  \'fe  sx
altstringchar  \'fd  ux
altstringchar  \'c6  Cx
altstringchar  \'d8  Gx
altstringchar  \'a6  Hx
altstringchar  \'ac  Jx
altstringchar  \'de  Sx
altstringchar  \'dd  Ux

altstringtype "utf8" "tex" ".html" ".utf"
# 
altstringchar Ä‰ cx
altstringchar Ä gx
altstringchar Ä¥ hx
altstringchar Äµ jx
altstringchar Å sx
altstringchar Å­ ux
altstringchar Äˆ Cx
altstringchar Äœ Gx
altstringchar Ä¤ Hx
altstringchar Ä´ Jx
altstringchar Åœ Sx 
altstringchar Å¬ Ux


#			Quick Reference
#			===============
#
#   A   -a, -e
#   B   -em[aeo]
#   C   -eC
#   D   -inD[aeio]
#   E   -a, -e, nE--a, ne--E 
#   F   -ino + -o; -ina + -a
#   G   -iGi, -igo
#   H   -uj[ao]jn
#   I   -[aei] > ~a + -io + -ia (teolog[i]o, filozof[i]o...)
#       -io > ~io + ~o (Algxerio/I -> Algxero, Algxerio)
#       -iano/I > ~ano, ~anion (algxeriano/FI > algxerano, algxeranino)
#   J   -eJ[ao]jn
#   K   Kolektoj: ar[ao]jn
#   L   -i > -iLo, -a > igiLo (atentu transirIGon!!)
#   M   Mal-
#   N   Nombro: unu-, du-, plur-, multe-
#   O   -o; ankaux deklinacias -a/vortojn (por senadjektivaj paradigmoj)
#   P   Pronomoj (mi, iu); jn (gefilan, gefilojn; Alpa[j][n], Alpoj[n])
#   Q   -iGxi, -igxo;
#   R   Re-
#   S   -iSt + -istino (la rusa -iSt)
#   T   transiraj verboj
#   U   -ul<in>[aeo]
#   V   Verbo (netransira)
#   W   -an<in>[ao]
#   X   aldonu trunkigon (apuda/AX -> apud, apuda...); igi > igxi
#   Y   -ajxo
#   Z   -ism (la rusa -iZm)

prefixes

flag *E:
    .			>	NE		# kiel bona -> nebona

flag *M:
    .			>	MAL		# kiel bona -> malbona

flag *N:
    .			>	UNU		# kiel unuflanka, unufoja
    .			>	NEUNU		# kiel neunufoja
    .			>	DU
    .			>	AMBAUx
    .			>	TRI
    .			>	KVAR
    .			>	KVIN
    .			>	SES
    .			>	SEP
    .			>	OK
    .			>	NAUx
    .			>	DEK
    .			>	CENT
    .			>	MIL
    .			>	KELK
    .			>	DEKKELK
    .			>	PLUR
    [AEIJOU]	>	MULT
    [^AEIJOU]	>	MULTE


flag *R:
    .			>	RE		# kiel fari -> refari

suffixes

flag *A:
    A			>	-A,E
    A			>	J
    A			>	JN
    A			>	N
    I			>	-I,A
    I			>	-I,AJ
    I			>	-I,AJN
    I			>	-I,AN
    I			>	-I,E
    O			>	-O,A
    O			>	-O,AJ
    O			>	-O,AJN
    O			>	-O,AN
    O			>	-O,E

flag *B:
    A			>	-A,EMA
    A			>	-A,EMAJ
    A			>	-A,EMAJN
    A			>	-A,EMAN
    A			>	-A,EME
    A			>	-A,EMO
    A			>	-A,EMON
    I			>	-I,EMA
    I			>	-I,EMAJ
    I			>	-I,EMAJN
    I			>	-I,EMAN
    I			>	-I,EME
    I			>	-I,EMO
    I			>	-I,EMON

flag *C:
    A			>	-A,ECA
    A			>	-A,ECAJ
    A			>	-A,ECAJN
    A			>	-A,ECAN
    A			>	-A,ECE
    A			>	-A,ECO
    A			>	-A,ECON
    I			>	-I,ECA
    I			>	-I,ECAJ
    I			>	-I,ECAJN
    I			>	-I,ECAN
    I			>	-I,ECE
    I			>	-I,ECO
    I			>	-I,ECON

flag *D:        # -inDa
    A			>	-A,INDA
    A			>	-A,INDAJ
    A			>	-A,INDAJN
    A			>	-A,INDAN
    A			>	-A,INDE
    A			>	-A,INDO
    A			>	-A,INDON
    A           >	-A,INDAJxO
    A           >	-A,INDAJxOJ
    A           >	-A,INDAJxOJN
    A           >	-A,INDAJxON
    A           >	-A,INDAS
    A           >	-A,INDIS
    A           >	-A,INDOS
    A           >	-A,INDUS
    I			>	NDA
    I			>	NDAJ
    I			>	NDAJN
    I			>	NDAN
    I			>	NDE
    I			>	NDO
    I			>	NDON
    I			>	NDAJxO      # ridindajxo
    I			>	NDAJxOJ
    I			>	NDAJxOJN
    I			>	NDAJxON
    I			>	NDAS
    I			>	NDI
    I			>	NDOS
    I			>	NDUS

flag *E:
    A			>	-A,E
    A			>	J
    A			>	JN
    A			>	N
    O			>	-O,A
    O			>	-O,AJ
    O			>	-O,AJN
    O			>	-O,AN
    O			>	-O,E

flag *F:
    A			>	-A,E
    A			>	-A,INE
    A			>	-A,INA
    A			>	-A,INAJ
    A			>	-A,INAJN
    A			>	-A,INAN
    A			>	J
    A			>	JN
    A			>	N
    A			>	-A,INO
    A			>	-A,INOJ
    A			>	-A,INOJN
    A			>	-A,INON
    A			>	-A,O
    A			>	-A,OJ
    A			>	-A,OJN
    A			>	-A,ON
    E			>	-E,INE  # agronome/FI -> agronomino
    E			>	-E,INA
    E			>	-E,INAJ
    E			>	-E,INAJN
    E			>	-E,INAN
    E			>	-E,INO
    E			>	-E,INOJ
    E			>	-E,INOJN
    E			>	-E,INON
    I			>	-I,A
    I			>	-I,AJ
    I			>	-I,AJN
    I			>	-I,AN
    I			>	-I,E
    I			>	-I,O
    I			>	-I,OJ
    I			>	-I,OJN
    I			>	-I,ON
    I			>	NE
    I			>	NA
    I			>	NAJ
    I			>	NAJN
    I			>	NAN
    I			>	NO
    I			>	NOJ
    I                   >	NOJN
    I			>	NON
    O			>	-O,A
    O			>	-O,AJ
    O			>	-O,AJN
    O			>	-O,AN
    O			>	-O,E
    O			>	-O,INE
    O			>	-O,INA
    O			>	-O,INAJ
    O			>	-O,INAJN
    O			>	-O,INAN
    O			>	-O,INO
    O			>	-O,INOJ
    O			>	-O,INOJN
    O			>	-O,INON
    O			>	J
    O			>	JN
    O			>	N
